Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 3

Terms

16-3-301. Duration of terms.

It is the duty of the judges of the supreme court to hold its terms at the different places as designated by law, until all the causes are determined or otherwise disposed of, or until it becomes necessary to adjourn to hold court at another point.

Code 1858, § 4510 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 6); Shan., § 6344; Code 1932, § 10646; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-316.

Cross-References. Places where supreme court to hold court, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 51.

16-3-302. Adjourned terms.

The court may sit upon its own adjournment, and hold its term at any time, for the purpose of hearing and deciding unfinished business.

Code 1858, § 4511 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 6); Shan., § 6345; Code 1932, § 10647; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-317.

16-3-303. Adjournment from day to day.

Any judge in attendance at any time may adjourn court, in the absence of the other judges, from day to day, until they are able to attend.

The clerk or sheriff may also adjourn the court from day to day, for one (1) week at the first of the term, if no judge attends.

Code 1858, §§ 4506, 4507 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 199, § 4); Shan., §§ 6340, 6341; Code 1932, §§ 10642, 10643; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-318.

16-3-304. Adjournment to court in course.

The clerk, at the expiration of the week specified in § 16-3-303, or the single judge in attendance in the case mentioned in § 16-3-303(a), if satisfied that a quorum cannot be had, may adjourn to the court in course.

Adjournment works no discontinuance in any case, but the business stands over until the next term, and may then be disposed of, and all process, recognizances, or other obligations enforced as if no continuance had been made.

Code 1858, §§ 4508, 4509; Shan., §§ 6342, 6343; Code 1932, §§ 10644, 10645; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-319.

16-3-305. Orders opening and closing terms.

The court has the power, by an order signed by three (3) of its members and forwarded to the clerk at any of the places where its sessions are required to be held, to open any term of the court at such place, without the attendance of the judges of the court, and likewise an order of adjournment or any other order, judgment or decree, signed by three (3) of the judges, may be entered in the absence of the members of the court. The signed orders shall be entered by the clerk on the minutes of the court, and shall have the effect of signed minute orders from the time received and filed by the clerk. The signed orders shall be filed and preserved by the clerk receiving them, until compared with the minutes by the court, and the minutes shall be examined and signed by the court at least once every thirty (30) days.

Acts 1915, ch. 95, § 2; Shan., § 135a2; Code 1932, § 155; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-320.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure (Michael R. Tilley), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

16-3-306. Continuation of terms — Concurrent terms.

Every term of the court when opened shall remain open until an order of adjournment is entered, and it shall be lawful for the terms of court in all the grand divisions to be open and running concurrently.

Acts 1915, ch. 95, § 3; Shan., § 135a3; Code 1932, § 156; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-321.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

16-3-307. Rules for terms and transfers.

The court is empowered to make all necessary rules to carry out the purposes of §§ 16-2-104, 16-3-305, and 16-3-306, and to expedite the hearing of cases.

Acts 1915, ch. 95, § 4; Shan., § 135a4; Code 1932, § 157; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-322.

16-3-308. Special term.

The judges of the supreme court have the power to appoint and hold a special term, upon giving twenty (20) days' notice of the time in some newspaper in the division in which the court is held, for the trial of causes that they deem essential to the public interest.

Acts 1868-1869, ch. 28, § 2; Shan., § 6346; Code 1932, § 10648; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-323.

Cited: Grissom v. H. K. Ferguson Co., 205 Tenn. 580, 329 S.W.2d 816, 1959 Tenn. LEXIS 396 (1959).